Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1 REGISTRATION AND TAXATION
42-3-121. Violation of registration provisions - penalty.

It is unlawful to commit any of the following acts:

To operate or permit the operation, upon a highway, of a motor vehicle subject to registration under this article or to possess or control a trailer coach or trailer that is not registered and does not display the number plates issued for such vehicle or trailer coach for the current year, except for trailer coaches or trailers owned by a licensed dealer or licensed manufacturer while being held for sale or resale or while operated on the streets or highways with dealer plates or depot tags authorized pursuant to section 42-3-116;

To display or permit to be displayed, to have in possession, or to offer for sale a certificate of title, validation tab or sticker, or registration number plate knowing the same to be fictitious or to have been stolen, cancelled, revoked, suspended, or altered;

To lend to or knowingly permit the use by one not entitled thereto a certificate of title, registration card, or registration number plate issued to the lending or permitting person;

To fail or refuse to surrender to the department, upon demand, a certificate of title, registration card, or registration number plate that has been suspended, cancelled, or revoked;

To use a false name or address, to knowingly make a false statement, or to knowingly conceal a material fact in an application for the registration, renewal registration, or duplicate registration of a motor vehicle;

To use or permit the use of a noncommercial or recreational vehicle to transport cargo or passengers for profit or hire or in a business or commercial enterprise;

To use or permit the use of a truck or truck tractor registered as a collector's item pursuant to section 42-12-401 (1)(c) to transport cargo or passengers for profit or hire or in a business or commercial enterprise;

To drive or permit to be driven a truck or truck tractor registered as a collector's item pursuant to section 42-12-401 (1)(c) for any purpose other than those purposes allowed in section 42-12-401 (1)(c).

A person who violates paragraph (a) or (c) of subsection (1) of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

A person who violates paragraph (b), (d), or (e) of subsection (1) of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

A person who violates paragraph (f) or (g) of subsection (1) of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1102, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2008:

(1)(a) amended, p. 638, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(1)(g), (1)(h), and (2)(c) amended, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 243, § 4, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-133 as it existed prior to 2005, and the former § 42-3-121 was relocated to § 42-3-204.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a class B traffic infraction, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(I); for the penalty for a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(II).

42-3-122. Perjury on a motor vehicle registration application.

A person commits perjury on a motor vehicle registration application if such person knowingly makes a materially false statement, other than those prohibited by sections 18-8-502 and 18-8-503, C.R.S., on a motor vehicle registration application that such person does not believe to be true, under an oath required or authorized by law.

Perjury on a motor vehicle registration application is a class 1 petty offense.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1104, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-140 as it existed prior to 2005, and the former § 42-3-122 was relocated to § 42-3-207.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a class 1 petty offense, see § 18-1.3-503.

42-3-123. Dishonored payment - recovery of taxes, fees, and plates.

If the registration of a vehicle required to be registered under this article is procured or perfected by the owner, or by a person or agent in the owner's behalf, and the registration fee and specific ownership tax are paid by check, money order, draft, bill of exchange, or other negotiable instrument that is dishonored and not paid by the person upon whom drawn, the registration shall be revoked as soon as the dishonored or unpaid instrument is returned to the authorized agent. Upon the return of such check, money order, draft, bill of exchange, or other negotiable instrument to the authorized agent, evidencing nonpayment or dishonor of same, the authorized agent shall notify the owner in writing, at the address appearing on the person's ownership tax receipt, by registered or certified mail, of the revoked registration resulting from such nonpayment or dishonor. The notice shall request the return to the authorized agent of the tax receipt, license fee receipt, and registration number plates issued under such revoked registration within ten days after the date of mailing of the notice.

If the owner fails to return any requested documents or license plates to the authorized agent within a reasonable time, as specified by the authorized agent, after the date of mailing of the notice, the authorized agent may immediately repossess the tax receipt, license fee receipt, and license plates that were issued under the canceled registration, and the county sheriff or the Denver manager of safety, or an equivalent person in the city and county of Broomfield, upon request by an authorized agent, shall sequester or recover possession of the receipts and license plates within his or her jurisdiction. The sheriff, manager, or equivalent who has recovered possession of a receipt or license plate shall transfer the receipt or license plate to the authorized agent. An owner who attaches or uses license plates acquired under a canceled registration is subject to the penalties provided in section 42-3-121.

The authorized agent, upon accounting for repossessed plates, shall receive a refund of any sum paid over to the county treasurer, or such equivalent position in the city and county of Broomfield, or to the department, as provided by sections 42-3-304 to 42-3-306, in each case where an owner or the owner's agent has issued a check, money order, draft, bill of exchange, or other negotiable instrument that has been dishonored and not paid by the person upon whom drawn; and, likewise, the county treasurer, or such equivalent position in the city and county of Broomfield, and the department making such refund shall further effect appropriate refunds and deductions as may be necessary to adjust and balance the books and records of the county treasurer and the department after making the initial refund to the authorized agent.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1104, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2017:

(2) amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 368, § 15, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-141 as it existed prior to 2005, and the former § 42-3-123 was relocated to § 42-3-202.

42-3-124. Violation - penalty.

A person who violates a provision of this article for which no other penalty is provided in this article commits a class B traffic infraction and shall be punished as provided in section 42-4-1701 (3)(a).

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1105, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-142 as it existed prior to 2005, and portions of the former § 42-3-124 were relocated to §§ 42-3-114 and 42-3-203.

42-3-125. Fleet operators - registration period certificates - multi-year registrations.

The department may issue to a fleet operator, upon application of the fleet operator, a registration period certificate. Such registration period certificate shall be presented to the appropriate authorized agent no later than the tenth day of the month in which registration of any motor vehicle is required by this article. When so presented, the twelve-month period stated in the registration period certificate shall govern the date on which registration is required for all fleet vehicles owned or leased by the fleet operator.

Notwithstanding section 42-3-207 (1)(b), the department may promulgate rules to establish requirements for a fleet operator to register the operator's fleet vehicles and have them identified by special license plates that do not require an annual validating tab or sticker. Registration fees payable on fleet vehicles under a multi-year agreement shall not be discounted below the otherwise applicable annual registration fees.

Vehicles registered by a fleet operator after the issuance of a registration period certificate or the execution of a multi-year agreement shall be subject to section 42-3-109.

The annual registration fees prescribed in sections 42-3-304 to 42-3-306 for fleet vehicles shall be reduced by twenty-five percent at the end of each successive quarter of the registration period that has elapsed prior to making application for the balance of the registration period.

The fees and taxes for vehicles registered prior to the effective date of the registration period certificate or multi-year agreement shall be apportioned in the manner prescribed in subsection (2) of this section.

This section shall not apply to vehicles registered under reciprocal agreements between the state of Colorado and any foreign country or another state or territory or a possession of the United States.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1105, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-143 as it existed prior to 2005, and the former § 42-3-125 was repealed in House Bill 05-1107.

42-3-126. Notice - primary body color.

If the primary body color of a motor vehicle is subsequently changed from the primary body color that is identified in the application for registration for the motor vehicle, the owner of the motor vehicle shall notify the department in writing, within thirty days after the color of such motor vehicle is changed, of the new primary body color of the motor vehicle. The primary body color of a motor vehicle shall be identified using the standard color descriptions of the department that are established pursuant to section 42-3-105 (1)(e).

Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 650, § 23, effective May 27; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1106, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 1511, § 69, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

This section, as enacted by Senate Bill 05-047, was originally numbered as § 42-3-145 but was relocated to and harmonized with § 42-3-126 as enacted by House Bill 05-1107.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a class B traffic infraction, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(I).

42-3-127. Sale of special mobile machinery.

A person who sells special mobile machinery in the ordinary course of business shall notify in writing the buyer of the machinery that the machinery is required to be registered under this article. A person who violates this section commits a class B traffic infraction for each item of special mobile machinery sold without such a notice.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1172), ch. 320, p. 1491, § 8, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a class B traffic infraction, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(I).